District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.14

Civil liability.

(a)

Any provider, facility, or person who enters into a contract for continuing care at a facility without having first delivered a disclosure statement meeting the requirements of this chapter to the person contracting for continuing care, or enters into a contract for continuing care at a facility with a person who has relied on a disclosure statement that omits to state, or misstates, a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, shall be liable to the person contracting for continuing care for actual damages and repayment of all fees paid to the provider, facility, or person violating this chapter, less the reasonable value of care and lodging provided to the resident by or on whose behalf the contract for continuing care was entered into prior to discovery of the violation, misstatement, or omission or the time the violation, misstatement, or omission should reasonably have been discovered, together with interest thereon at the legal rate for judgments, court costs, and reasonable attorneys’ fees. The interest shall accrue on the date of entering into a contract or when the resident or their representative knew or should have known of the violation, omission, or misstatement, whichever is later.

(b)

Liability under this section shall exist regardless of whether the provider or person liable had actual knowledge of the misstatement or omission.

(c)

A person shall not file or maintain an action under this section if the person, before filing the action, received a written offer of a refund of all amounts paid the provider, facility, or person violating this chapter, together with interest at the legal rate for judgments, less the current contractual value of care and lodging provided prior to receipt of the offer, and if the offer recited the provisions of this section and the recipient of the offer failed to accept it within 30 days of actual receipt. The interest shall begin to accrue on the date of entering into a contract or when the resident or their representative knew or should have known of the violation, omission, or misstatement, whichever is later. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Mayor from bringing an action for a violation of this chapter.

(d)

An action shall not be maintained to enforce a liability created under this chapter unless brought before the expiration of 3 years after the execution of the contract for continuing care that gave rise to the violation or the date when the resident or his or her representative knew or should have known of the violation, omission, or misstatement, whichever is earlier.

(e)

The Mayor may impose civil penalties or take other action appropriate to correct violations of this chapter. The Mayor may bring an action to enforce this chapter.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 114, 52 DCR 799